apertium-krl.krl.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_PROJEKT/U

0:u NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:i NOUN_SGGEN_N ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;


LEXICON NOUN_TAP/PO

0:po NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:pu NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:po NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_RUA/TO

0:to NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:du NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:tu NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:to NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:do NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:vo NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:to NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:to NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:tolo NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_RUA/DO

0:to NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:do NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:du NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:to NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:do NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:vo NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_TI/ETO

0:eto  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:etu  NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:eto  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:ijo  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:to  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:to  NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:tolo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_T/YÖ

0:yö NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:yö NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:ö  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:ö  NOUN_PLPAR_ITÄ ;
0:ö  NOUN_PLGEN_IJEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_T/IE

0:ie NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ie NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:e  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:e  NOUN_PLGEN_IJEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_Š/UO

0:uo NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:uo NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:o  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_NUMERO

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0 NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0 NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0 NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0 NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠIVU

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0 NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0 NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0 NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0 NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_HILL/O

0:o NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:o NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:o NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_VIDEO

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0 NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0 NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0 NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0 NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_PERIN/TÖ

0:tö NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nö NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:tö NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;
0:nö NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:tö NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_NÄYTTELY

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0 NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0 NOUN_SGPAR_Ö ;
0 NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;
0 NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_ÄMMÖ

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0 NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0 NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;
0 NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_KYYK/KÄ

0:kä NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:k  NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_HIIH/TO

0:to NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:to NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:to NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:to NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:to NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_VIČ/ČA

0:ča NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:ču NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:čo NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:čo NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_PAIK/KA

0:ka NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ku NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:ko NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:ko NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:ko NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_TIEPÄTK/Ä

0:ä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0:y  NOUN_SGPAR_Ä ;
0:ö  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:ö  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:ö  NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;
0:ö  NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_TA/PA

0:pa NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:va NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:vo NOUN_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
0:po NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK_STRONG ;
0:po NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:po NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_STUDENT/TI

0:ti NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ti NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:t NOUN_PLGEN_IEN ;
0:tilo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_MUSIIK/KI

0:ki NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_MERK/KI

0:ki NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_VOIT/TO

0:to NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:to NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:to NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:to NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:tolo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_MA/A

0:a NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0   NOUN_PLPAR_ITA ;
0:a NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_KU/U

0:u NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:u NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠEU/TU

0:tu NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tu NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:vu NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:vu NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠOIT/TU

0:tu NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tu NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:u NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ILLAČ/ČU

0:ču NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ču NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:ču NOUN_SGILL_H ;
0:u NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_LUON/TO

0:to NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tu  NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:no NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:to NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_JOUK/KO

0:ko NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ko NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:ku  NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ko NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_KIRIK/KÖ

0:kö NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ky  NOUN_SGPAR_Ö ;
0:ö NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_AL/KU

0:ku NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_LOP/PU

0:pu NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:pu NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:pu NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:u NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_A/PU

0:pu NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:pu NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:pu NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:vu NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠU/KU

0:ku NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ku NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:vu NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;


LEXICON NOUN_LEH/TI

0:ti NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0:ti NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:tilö  NOUN_CASES_LÖ/I_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_KO/TI

0:ti NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ji  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ti NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:tilo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠIJAHI/NI

0:ni NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TU ;
0:s  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_KEHITTÄMI/NI

0:ni NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TY ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:s  NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;
0:s  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ELÄKELÄI/NE

0:ne NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TY ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:s  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE

0:ne NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TU ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:s  NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä

0:ä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0    NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0    NOUN_PLPAR_IE  ;

LEXICON NOUN_SOIN/TI

0:ti  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ni  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:n    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:t    NOUN_PLPAR_IE  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KOS’S’ON/TA

0:ta  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:na  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:n    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:t    NOUN_PLPAR_IE  ;
0:to  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_KAŠVATTAJ/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0    NOUN_PLPAR_IE  ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠEIK/KA

0:ka  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:u  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:o    NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:o    NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_KAUP/PA

0:pa  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:pa  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:pu  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:po    NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:po    NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_KART/TA

0:ta  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:tu  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:to    NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:to    NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_PAKIN/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:o    NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:o    NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_SULČČIN/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:o  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:o  NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_KAL/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:u  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:o  NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠKOL/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o  NOUN_PLPAR_I ;
0    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_TAPAHTUM/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:o  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0    NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_PEŠ/Ä

0:ä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0    NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:y  NOUN_SGPAR_Ä ;
0    NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_KENT/TÄ

0:tä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:t   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN
aikakauš#lehti%<n%>:aikakaus0leh NOUN_LEH/TI ;
alku%<n%>:al  NOUN_AL/KU ;
apu%<n%>:a NOUN_A/PU ;
eläkeläine%<n%>:eläkeläi NOUN_ELÄKELÄI/NE ;
etno#illačču%<n%>:etno0illač  NOUN_ILLAČ/ČU ;
hiitourheiluliitto%<n%>:hiihtourheiluliit  NOUN_VOIT/TO ;
hillo%<n%>:hill NOUN_HILL/O ;
internetti#šivu%<n%>:internetti0šivu  NOUN_ŠIVU ;
kanšalais#järještö%<n%>:kanšalais0järještö NOUN_ÄMMÖ ;
kartta%<n%>:kart NOUN_KART/TA ;
katu%<n%>:ka  NOUN_ŠEU/TU ;
kauppa%<n%>:kaup NOUN_KAUP/PA ;
kehittämini%<n%>:kehittämi NOUN_KEHITTÄMI/NI ;
kenttä%<n%>:kent NOUN_KENT/TÄ ;
kiinnitämini%<n%>:kiinnittämi NOUN_KEHITTÄMI/NI ;
kilpahiihto%<n%>:kilpahiih  NOUN_HIIH/TO ;
kilpailu%<n%>:kilpailu NOUN_NUMERO ;
kirikkö%<n%>:kirik NOUN_KIRIK/KÖ ;
kiäntäjä%<n%>:kiäntäj NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä ;
kokko%<n%>:kok NOUN_JOUK/KO ;
konehisto%<n%>:konehist NOUN_HILL/O ;
konsertti%<n%>:konsert  NOUN_STUDENT/TI ;
koti%<n%>:ko NOUN_KO/TI ;
koukku%<n%>:kouk  NOUN_AL/KU ;
koululaine%<n%>:koululai NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE ;
kučču%<n%>:kuč  NOUN_ILLAČ/ČU ;
kulttuuri#šeura%<n%>:kulttuuri0šeur  NOUN_PAKIN/A ;
kuu%<n%>:ku  NOUN_KU/U ;
kyykkä%<n%>:kyyk  NOUN_KYYK/KÄ ;
käsi#paikka%<n%>:käsi0paik NOUN_PAIK/KA ;
käsittely%<n%>:käsittely NOUN_NÄYTTELY ;
käsi#työ%<n%>:käsi0t NOUN_T/YÖ ;
lahja%<n%>:lahj NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
lapsien#kazvattaja%<n%>:lapsien0kazvattaj NOUN_KAŠVATTAJ/A ;
lehti%<n%>:leh NOUN_LEH/TI ;
liitto%<n%>:liit  NOUN_VOIT/TO ;
lippu%<n%>:lip NOUN_LOP/PU ;
lisä#tieto%<n%>:lisä0ti  NOUN_TI/ETO ;
loppu#konsertti%<n%>:loppu0konsert  NOUN_STUDENT/TI ;
loppu%<n%>:lop NOUN_LOP/PU ;
luokka%<n%>:luok NOUN_PAIK/KA ;
luomis#työ%<n%>:luomis0t NOUN_T/YÖ ;
yhtijö%<n%>:yhtijö NOUN_ÄMMÖ ;
luonto%<n%>:luon NOUN_LUON/TO ;
maa%<n%>:ma  NOUN_MA/A ;
matka%<n%>:mat  NOUN_ŠEIK/KA ;
meččä#tie%<n%>:meččä0t  NOUN_T/IE ;
miehol’a%<n%>:miehol’  NOUN_KAL/A ;
muisto#merkki%<n%>:muist0merk  NOUN_MERK/KI ;
musiikki%<n%>:musiik  NOUN_MUSIIK/KI ;
nauha%<n%>:nauh  NOUN_KAL/A ;
netti#šivu%<n%>:netti0šivu  NOUN_ŠIVU ;
nuoriso%<n%>:nuoriso NOUN_NUMERO ;
näyttely%<n%>:näyttely NOUN_NÄYTTELY ;
paikkakunta%<n%>:paikkakun NOUN_KOS’S’ON/TA ;
pakkaispäivä%<n%>:pakkaispäiv NOUN_PEŠ/Ä ;
palačči#ranta#katu%<n%>:palačči0ranta0ka  NOUN_ŠEU/TU ;
pankka%<n%>:pank NOUN_PAIK/KA ;
pelaštaja%<n%>:pelaštaj NOUN_KAŠVATTAJ/A ;
penkki%<n%>:penk  NOUN_MERK/KI ;
muisto#merkki%<n%>:muisto0merk  NOUN_MERK/KI ;
perintö%<n%>:perin NOUN_PERIN/TÖ ;
pimie#kuu%<n%>:pimie0ku  NOUN_KU/U ;
pito%<n%>:pi NOUN_RUA/TO ;
planetta%<n%>:planet NOUN_KART/TA ;
pohjone%<n%>:pohjo NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE ;
projektu%<n%>:projekt NOUN_PROJEKT/U ;
päivä#koti%<n%>:päivä0ko NOUN_KO/TI ;
rahvahan#tapa%<n%>:rahvahan0ta  NOUN_TA/PA ;
rakentamini%<n%>:rakentami NOUN_ŠIJAHI/NI ;
rekonstruointi%<n%>:rekonstruoin NOUN_SOIN/TI ;
ruado%<n%>:rua NOUN_RUA/DO ;
ruado%<n%>:rua NOUN_RUA/DO ;
ruato%<n%>:rua NOUN_RUA/TO ;
ruoho%<n%>:ruoh  NOUN_HILL/O ;
rupla%<n%>:rupl NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
ryhmä%<n%>:ryhm NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä ;
šana%<n%>:šan NOUN_PAKIN/A ;
šeikka%<n%>:šeik NOUN_ŠEIK/KA ;
šekaviestihiihto%<n%>:šekaviestihiih  NOUN_HIIH/TO ;
šeutu%<n%>:šeu  NOUN_ŠEU/TU ;
šielu%<n%>:šielu  NOUN_ŠIVU ;
sointi%<n%>:soin NOUN_SOIN/TI ;
šoittu%<n%>:šoit  NOUN_ŠOIT/TU ;
studentti%<n%>:student  NOUN_STUDENT/TI ;
šuku%<n%>:šu NOUN_ŠU/KU ;
sul’č'cina%<n%>:sul’ččin  NOUN_SULČČIN/A ;
šuo%<n%>:š  NOUN_Š/UO ;
šuu%<n%>:šu  NOUN_KU/U ;
šuunta%<n%>:šuun NOUN_KOS’S’ON/TA ;
tapa%<n%>:ta  NOUN_TA/PA ;
taphtuma%<n%>:tapahtum NOUN_TAPAHTUM/A ;
tappo%<n%>:tap NOUN_TAP/PO ;
tie%<n%>:t  NOUN_T/IE ;
tieto%<n%>:ti  NOUN_TI/ETO ;
tie#pätkä%<n%>:tie0pätk NOUN_TIEPÄTK/Ä ;
toimeh#pito%<n%>:toimeh0pi NOUN_RUA/TO ;
tuotanto%<n%>:tuotan NOUN_LUON/TO ;
tuuvvittamini%<n%>:tuuvvittami NOUN_ŠIJAHI/NI ;
työ%<n%>:t NOUN_T/YÖ ;
ukko%<n%>:uk NOUN_JOUK/KO ;
ulko#maa%<n%>:ulko0ma  NOUN_MA/A ;
urheiluministerijö%<n%>:urheiluministerijö NOUN_ÄMMÖ ;
vaihto%<n%>:vaih NOUN_VOIT/TO ;
valtijon#yli#opisto%<n%>:valtijon0yli0opisto NOUN_NUMERO ;
vičča%<n%>:vič NOUN_VIČ/ČA ;
video%<n%>:video NOUN_VIDEO ;
viestihiihto%<n%>:viestihiih  NOUN_HIIH/TO ;
vuotis#päivä%<n%>:vuotis0päiv NOUN_PEŠ/Ä ;
